Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RULE EFFECTIVE.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding chapter 14, section 181.213, subdivision 2, paragraph (c), or any other law or rule to the contrary, Minnesota Rules, parts 5200.2060 to 5200.2090, as published on October 28, 2024, State Register, volume 49, number 18, page 443, establishing nursing home minimum wage standards affecting medical assistance reimbursement rates are effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end